Maryland, session 2026, HB1188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
4–302.
There is a Down Payment and Settlement Expense Loan Program.
4–303.
The purpose of the Program is to provide financing for down payment and settlement
expenses to enable eligible homebuyers to purchase homes.
4–310.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PROGRAM FUND” MEANS THE DOWN PAYMENT AND
SETTLEMENT EXPENSE LOAN PROGRAM FUND.
(B) THERE IS A DOWN PAYMENT AND SETTLEMENT EXPENSE LOAN
PROGRAM FUND.
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM FUND IS TO SUPPORT THE DOWN
PAYMENT AND SETTLEMENT EXPENSE LOAN PROGRAM.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM FUND.
(E) (1) THE PROGRAM FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS
NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE PROGRAM FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE PROGRAM FUND.

HOUSE BILL 1188 3
(F) THE PROGRAM FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE PROGRAM FUND UNDER §
2–4B–02 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE PROGRAM
FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE PROGRAM FUND.
(G) THE PROGRAM FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE FINANCING FOR
DOWN PAYMENT AND SETTLEMENT EXPENSES TO ENABLE ELIGIBLE HOMEBUYERS
TO PURCHASE HOMES.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
PROGRAM FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE PROGRAM FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE PROGRAM FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE PROGRAM FUND FOR THE DOWN
PAYMENT AND SETTLEMENT EXPENSE LOAN PROGRAM IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND
IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR THE PROGRAM.
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(G–2) “EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX”
MEANS THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 7.7 OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(g–2)] (G–3) (1) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the
Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission.
(2) “Executive Director” includes a deputy, an inspector, or any other
individual acting within the scope of the Executive Director’s authority.

HOUSE BILL 1188
2–102.
(a) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this article and in other articles
of the Code, the Comptroller shall administer the laws that relate to:
(1) the admissions and amusement tax;
(2) the boxing and wrestling tax;
(3) the digital advertising gross revenues tax;
(4) THE EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE
TAX;
(5) the income tax;
[(5)] (6) the Maryland estate tax;
[(6)] (7) the Maryland generation–skipping transfer tax;
[(7)] (8) the motor carrier tax;
[(8)] (9) the motor fuel tax;
[(9)] (10) the sales and use tax; and
[(10)] (11) the savings and loan association franchise tax.
SUBTITLE 4B. EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX
REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.
2–4B–01.
FROM THE EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX
REVENUE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO
ADMINISTER THE EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX
TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST ACCOUNT.
2–4B–02.
AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTION REQUIRED UNDER § 2–4B–01 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINING EXCESS
OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX TO THE DOWN PAYMENT

HOUSE BILL 1188 5
AND SETTLEMENT EXPENSE LOAN PROGRAM FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 4–310
OF THE HOUSING AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
TITLE 7.7. EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
7.7–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “APPLICABLE DATE” MEANS:
(1) FOR AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER THAT BECOMES A HEDGE FUND
TAXPAYER AFTER JULY 1, 2026, THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE YEAR IMMEDIATELY
PRECEDING THE TAXABLE YEAR IN WHICH THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER BECOMES A
HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER; AND
(2) FOR ANY OTHER APPLICABLE TAXPAYER, THE LAST DAY OF THE
FIRST FULL TAXABLE YEAR ENDING ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026.
(C) (1) “APPLICABLE ENTITY” MEANS:
(I) A CORPORATION;
(II) A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY;
(III) A PARTNERSHIP; OR
(IV) A REAL ESTATE INVESTMENT TRUST.
(2) “APPLICABLE ENTITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE AND EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(A) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; OR
(II) AN ORGANIZATION PRIMARILY ENGAGED IN THE
CONSTRUCTION OR REHABILITATION OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES.
(D) “APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE” MEANS A SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCE ACQUIRED BY AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER BEFORE JULY 1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 1188
(E) “APPLICABLE TAXPAYER” MEANS AN APPLICABLE ENTITY THAT:
(1) MANAGES FUNDS POOLED FROM INVESTORS; AND
(2) IS A FIDUCIARY OF THE INVESTORS.
(F) “DISQUALIFIED SALE” MEANS A SALE OR TRANSFER TO:
(1) A CORPORATION OR OTHER ENTITY ENGAGED IN A TRADE OR
BUSINESS; OR
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO OWNS ANOTHER SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE
AT THE TIME OF THE SALE OR TRANSFER.
(G) “HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER” MEANS AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER THAT HAS
$50,000,000 OR MORE IN NET VALUE OR ASSETS UNDER MANAGEMENT ON ANY DAY
DURING A TAXABLE YEAR.
(H) (1) “SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE” MEANS A RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY
CONSISTING OF ONE TO FOUR DWELLING UNITS LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(2) “SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) AN UNOCCUPIED SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE ACQUIRED
THROUGH FORECLOSURE;
(II) A SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE THAT IS:
1. NOT RENTED OR LEASED; AND
2. USED AS THE PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE OF ANY PERSON
WHO HAS AN OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER THAT OWNS THE
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE; OR
(III) A SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE CONSTRUCTED, ACQUIRED,
OR OPERATED WITH FEDERAL OR STATE FUNDS.
(I) “TAXABLE YEAR” MEANS A CALENDAR YEAR ENDING ON DECEMBER 31.
7.7–102.

HOUSE BILL 1188 7
(A) (1) AN EXCISE TAX IS IMPOSED ON THE ACQUISITION OF A
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE BY AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER DURING A TAXABLE
YEAR.
(2) THE EXCISE TAX RATE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS
EQUAL TO 50% OF THE FAIR MARKET VALUE OF THE SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE.
(3) AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER SHALL BE TREATED AS ACQUIRING A
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE IF THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER ACQUIRES A MAJORITY
OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE, REGARDLESS OF THE
PERCENTAGE OF THAT OWNERSHIP INTEREST.
(B) (1) AN EXCISE TAX IS IMPOSED ON AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER THAT
FAILS TO SATISFY THE REQUIREMENT UNDER § 7.7–103(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) THE EXCISE TAX IMPOSED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS EQUAL TO THE PRODUCT OF:
(I) $10,000; AND
(II) THE DIFFERENCE BETWEEN:
1. THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER AS OF THE LAST DAY OF THE
TAXABLE YEAR; AND
2. A. FOR AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER, THE MAXIMUM
NUMBER OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES UNDER § 7.7–103(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
B. FOR A HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER, THE MAXIMUM
NUMBER OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES UNDER § 7.7–103(C) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7.7–103.
(A) (1) AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER SATISFIES THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION IF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES
OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER AS OF THE LAST DAY OF THE TAXABLE YEAR
IS EQUAL TO OR LESS THAN THE MAXIMUM NUMBER PERMISSIBLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OR (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) A SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE THAT IS SOLD OR TRANSFERRED IN
A DISQUALIFIED SALE DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR IS TREATED AS A SINGLE–FAMILY

HOUSE BILL 1188
RESIDENCE OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER AS OF THE LAST DAY OF THE
TAXABLE YEAR.
(3) AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER SHALL BE TREATED AS OWNING A
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE IF THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER OWNS A MAJORITY
OWNERSHIP INTEREST IN THE SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE, REGARDLESS OF THE
PERCENTAGE OF THAT OWNERSHIP INTEREST.
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, FOR ANY
TAXABLE YEAR, THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES THAT AN
APPLICABLE TAXPAYER MAY OWN IS:
(1) FOR THE FIRST FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 25 PLUS 80% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
(2) FOR THE SECOND FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 25 PLUS 60% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
(3) FOR THE THIRD FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 25 PLUS 40% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
(4) FOR THE FOURTH FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 25 PLUS 20% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
AND
(5) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING MORE THAN 4 YEARS AFTER
THE APPLICABLE DATE, 25.
(C) THE MAXIMUM NUMBER OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES THAT A
HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER MAY OWN IS:
(1) FOR THE FIRST FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 80% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
(2) FOR THE SECOND FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 60% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;

HOUSE BILL 1188 9
(3) FOR THE THIRD FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 40% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
(4) FOR THE FOURTH FULL TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER THE
APPLICABLE DATE, 20% OF THE NUMBER OF APPLICABLE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES OWNED BY THE HEDGE FUND TAXPAYER ON THE APPLICABLE DATE;
AND
(5) FOR ANY TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING MORE THAN 4 YEARS AFTER
THE APPLICABLE DATE, 0.
7.7–104.
THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE
PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
SUBTITLE 2. RETURNS, REPORTS, AND CERTIFICATIONS.
7.7–201.
(A) AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER OATH, AND FILE
WITH THE COMPTROLLER AN EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES
EXCISE TAX RETURN, REPORT, AND CERTIFICATION FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR.
(B) (1) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL REQUIRE AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER
TO REPORT WITH THE RETURN REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
THE INFORMATION THAT THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES IS NECESSARY TO
CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, INCLUDE:
(I) THE DATES ON WHICH SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES OWNED
BY AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER WERE ACQUIRED BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER;
AND
(II) WHETHER A PERSON ACQUIRING THE SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCE FROM AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER OWNS ANY OTHER SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCE AT THE TIME OF THE ACQUISITION.
(C) (1) IF AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER SOLD OR TRANSFERRED A
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR, THE APPLICABLE

HOUSE BILL 1188
TAXPAYER SHALL INCLUDE WITH THE RETURN REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION A CERTIFICATION FROM EACH INDIVIDUAL TO WHOM A
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE IS SOLD OR TRANSFERRED.
(2) THE CERTIFICATION REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL
BE SIGNED BY THE PURCHASER OR TRANSFEREE AND STATE THE FOLLOWING:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE PURCHASER OR
TRANSFEREE; AND
(II) THE SALE IS NOT A DISQUALIFIED SALE.
7.7–202.
AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.7–201 OF
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS OF ANY SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCE
OWNED OR SOLD BY THE APPLICABLE TAXPAYER DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR.
SUBTITLE 3. TAX PAYMENT.
7.7–301.
(A) AN APPLICABLE TAXPAYER REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER §
7.7–201 OF THIS TITLE SHALL PAY THE EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX WITH THE RETURN.
(B) IF A CORPORATION, OTHER THAN A NONSTOCK, NONPROFIT
CORPORATION, IS REQUIRED TO PAY THE EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX, PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR THE TAX AND INTEREST AND
PENALTIES ON THE TAX EXTENDS TO ANY OFFICER OF THE CORPORATION WHO
EXERCISES DIRECT CONTROL OVER ITS FISCAL MANAGEMENT.
(C) IF A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR LIMITED LIABILITY
PARTNERSHIP, INCLUDING A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP REGISTERED AS A LIMITED
LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, IS REQUIRED TO PAY THE EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX, PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR THE TAX AND
INTEREST AND PENALTIES ON THE TAX EXTENDS TO ANY PERSON WHO EXERCISES
DIRECT CONTROL OVER THE FISCAL MANAGEMENT OF THE LIMITED LIABILITY
COMPANY OR LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP.
13–201.
In this subtitle, “tax information” means:

HOUSE BILL 1188 11
(4) any information contained in:
(i) an admissions and amusement tax return;
(ii) an alcoholic beverage tax return;
(iii) a bay restoration fee return;
(iv) a boxing and wrestling tax return;
(v) a digital advertising gross revenues tax return;
(vi) an E–9–1–1 fee return;
(vii) AN EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES
EXCISE TAX RETURN;
(VIII) a financial institution franchise tax return;
[(viii)] (IX) an inheritance tax return;
[(ix)] (X) a Maryland estate tax return;
[(x)] (XI) a motor carrier tax return;
[(xi)] (XII) a motor fuel tax return;
[(xii)] (XIII) a new tire fee return;
[(xiii)] (XIV) an other tobacco products tax return;
[(xiv)] (XV) a public service company franchise tax return;
[(xv)] (XVI) a sales and use tax return;
[(xvi)] (XVII) a savings and loan association franchise tax return;
[(xvii)] (XVIII) a tire recycling fee return;
[(xviii)] (XIX) a tobacco tax return; or
[(xix)] (XX) a transportation services assessment return.
13–508.

HOUSE BILL 1188
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax, digital
advertising gross revenues tax, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, public service
company franchise tax, EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE
TAX, financial institution franchise tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax is mailed, a person
or governmental unit against which the assessment is made may submit to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
digital advertising gross revenues tax, EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY
RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax,
or tobacco tax application for revision or claim for refund under subsection (a) of this
section; and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
13–509.
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, digital advertising gross revenues tax, EXCESS OWNERSHIP
OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel
tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax under § 13–508(a) of this subtitle, the Comptroller or
the Comptroller’s designee may issue an order decreasing or abating an assessment to
correct an erroneous assessment.
(b) If action is taken under subsection (a) of this section, the order shall state
clearly the reasons for decreasing or abating the assessment.

HOUSE BILL 1188 13
(c) Any order issued by the Comptroller under subsection (a) of this section shall
be final and not subject to appeal.
(d) The Comptroller’s refusal to enter an order under subsection (a) of this section
shall be final and not subject to appeal.
13–1001.
(H) A PERSON WHO IS REQUIRED TO FILE AN EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF
SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES EXCISE TAX RETURN AND WHO WILLFULLY FAILS TO
FILE THE RETURN AS REQUIRED UNDER TITLE 7.7 OF THIS ARTICLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND, ON CONVICTION, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000
OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
13–1002.
(a) A person who willfully files a false alcoholic beverage tax return is guilty of
perjury and, on conviction, is subject to the penalty for perjury.
(b) A person, including an officer of a corporation, who willfully files a false digital
advertising gross revenues tax return, a false financial institution franchise tax return, a
false public service company franchise tax return, or a false income tax return with the
intent to evade the payment of tax due under this article is guilty of perjury and, on
conviction, is subject to the penalty for perjury.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to the alcoholic beverage, digital
advertising gross revenues, EXCESS OWNERSHIP OF SINGLE–FAMILY RESIDENCES
EXCISE, financial institution franchise, public service company franchise, and income
taxes.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.